North Carolina, session 2025, HB773.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-83.15, 115C-83.16, and 115C-83.17 are repealed.
SECTION 2. Part 1B of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding the following new sections to read:
"§ 115C-83.17A. School performance scores.
(a) School Scores. – The State Board of Education shall award school performance scores
as required by G.S. 115C-12(9)c1. and calculated as provided in this section.
(b) Performance Scores for Elementary Schools. – For schools serving any students in
kindergarten through fifth grade, the State Board shall assign points on the following measures
available for that school:
(1) One point for each percent of students who score at or above proficient on
annual assessments for mathematics in grades three through five.
(2) One point for each percent of students who score at or above proficient on
annual assessments for reading in grades three through five.
(3) One point for each percent of students who score at or above proficient on the
annual assessment for reading in grade three.
(4) One point for each percent of students who score at or above proficient on the
annual assessment for science in grade five.
(5) One point for each percent of students who progress in achieving English
language proficiency on annual assessments in grades three through five.
(6) One point for each percent of students who met or exceeded growth on annual
assessments for mathematics in grades three through five.
(7) One point for each percent of students who met or exceeded growth on annual
assessments for reading in grades three through five.
(8) One point for each percent of students scoring in the twenty-fifth percentile
on the prior annual assessment for mathematics who met or exceeded growth
on the current year's annual assessment for mathematics in grades four and
five.
(9) One point for each percent of students scoring in the twenty-fifth percentile
on the prior annual assessment for reading who met or exceeded growth on
the current year's annual assessment for reading in grades four and five.
*H773-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Performance Scores for Middle Schools. – For schools serving any students in sixth
through eighth grade, the State Board shall assign points on the following measures available for
that school:
(1) One point for each percent of students who score at or above proficient on
annual assessments for mathematics in grades six through eight. For the
purposes of this subsection, an annual assessment for mathematics shall
include any mathematics course with an end-of-course test.
(2) One point for each percent of students who score at or above proficient on
annual assessments for reading in grades six through eight.
(3) One point for each percent of students who score at or above proficient on the
annual assessment for science in grade eight.
(4) One point for each percent of students who progress in achieving English
language proficiency on annual assessments in grades six through eight.
(5) One point for each percent of students who meet either of the following:
a. Score at or above proficient on an end-of-course assessment for a high
school level course.
b. Earn an industry certification or credential approved by the State
Board of Education.
(6) One point for each percent of students who met or exceeded growth on annual
assessments for mathematics in grades six through eight.
(7) One point for each percent of students who met or exceeded growth on annual
assessments for reading in grades six through eight.
(8) One point for each percent of students scoring in the twenty-fifth percentile
on the prior annual assessment for mathematics who met or exceeded growth
on the current year's annual assessment for mathematics in grades six through
eight.
(9) One point for each percent of students scoring in the twenty-fifth percentile
on the prior annual assessment for reading who met or exceeded growth on
the current year's annual assessment for reading in grades six through eight.
(d) Performance Scores for High Schools. – For schools serving any students in ninth
through twelfth grade, the State Board shall assign points on the following measures available
for that school:
(1) One point for each percent of students who score at or above proficient on the
NC Math I end-of-course test or, for students who completed NC Math I
before ninth grade, another mathematics course with an end-of-course test.
(2) One point for each percent of students who score at or above proficient on the
English II end-of-course test.
(3) One point for each percent of students who score at or above proficient on the
Biology end-of-course test.
(4) One point for each percent of students who earn at least one of the following:
a. A passing score on an exam in an advanced course, as defined in
G.S. 115C-174.26(a).
b. A passing grade in a dual enrollment course through Career and
College Promise.
c. Both of the following:
1. An Armed Services Qualification Test score that falls within
Category II or higher on the Armed Services Vocational
Aptitude Battery.
2. At least two credits in Junior Reserve Officers' Training Corps
courses from the same branch of the United States Armed
Forces.
Page 2 House Bill 773-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
d. An industry certification or credential approved by the State Board of
Education.
(5) One point for each percent of students who graduate within four years of
entering high school.
(6) One point for each percent of students who progress in achieving English
language proficiency.
(7) One point for each percent of students who met or exceeded growth on the
NC Math I end-of-course test or, for students who completed NC Math I
before ninth grade, another mathematics course with an end-of-course test.
(8) One point for each percent of students who met or exceeded growth on the
English II end-of-course test.
(9) One point for each percent of students scoring in the twenty-fifth percentile
on the prior assessment in mathematics who met or exceeded growth on the
NC Math I end-of-course test or, for students who complete NC Math I before
ninth grade, another mathematics course with an end-of-course test.
(10) One point for each percent of students scoring in the twenty-fifth percentile
on the eighth grade end-of-grade test for reading who met or exceeded growth
on the English II end-of-course test.
(e) Calculation of Performance Scores. – In calculating the school performance scores
earned by schools, the State Board of Education shall do all of the following:
(1) Use a composite approach to weigh the elements based on the number of
students measured by any given element.
(2) Proportionally adjust the scale to account for the absence of a school
performance element when awarding of scores to a school that does not have
a measure of one of the school performance elements annually assessed for
the grades taught at that school.
(3) Translate the school performance score to a 100-point scale to be used for
school reporting purposes as provided in G.S. 115C-12(9)c1., 115C-218.65,
115C-238.66, and 116-239.8.
(4) Calculate the number of students who met or exceeded growth on the annual
assessments for mathematics and reading identified in subsections (b), (c), and
(d) of this section using the Education Value-Added Assessment System
(EVAAS).
"§ 115C-83.17B. School performance grades.
The State Board of Education shall award school performance grades based on the following
scale and shall not modify the grades or add any other designation related to other performance
measures, such as a "plus" or "minus":
(1) For elementary schools, all of the following apply:
a. A school performance score of at least 62 is equivalent to a school
performance grade of A.
b. A school performance score of at least 54 is equivalent to a school
performance grade of B.
c. A school performance score of at least 41 is equivalent to a school
performance grade of C.
d. A school performance score of at least 32 is equivalent to a school
performance grade of D.
e. A school performance score of less than 32 is equivalent to a school
performance grade of F.
(2) For middle schools, high schools, and schools serving any student in grade six
or higher, all of the following apply:
House Bill 773-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. A school performance score of at least 64 is equivalent to a school
performance grade of A.
b. A school performance score of at least 57 is equivalent to a school
performance grade of B.
c. A school performance score of at least 44 is equivalent to a school
performance grade of C.
d. A school performance score of at least 34 is equivalent to a school
performance grade of D.
e. A school performance score of less than 34 is equivalent to a school
performance grade of F.
"§ 115C-83.17C. Performance of student subgroups.
(a) Establishment of Subgroups of Students. – The State Board shall establish the
minimum number of students in a subgroup served by a school that is necessary to disaggregate
information on student performance and to determine a subgroup performance score and grade
for the following subgroups of students:
(1) Economically disadvantaged students.
(2) Students from major racial and ethnic groups.
(3) Children with disabilities.
(4) English learners.
(b) Calculation of the School Performance Scores and Grades for Certain Subgroups of
Students Served by a School. – In addition to the school performance scores and grades awarded
under this Part, for each school that serves a minimum number of students in a subgroup of
students listed in subsection (a) of this section, the State Board of Education shall calculate school
performance scores and shall determine a corresponding school performance grade for each
subgroup using the same methods as set forth in G.S. 115C-83.17A and G.S. 115C-83.17B,
respectively. School performance scores for subgroups of students shall not be included in the
calculation of the school performance scores under G.S. 115C-83.17A.
"§ 115C-83.17D. School report cards.
(a) Indication of Growth. – In addition to awarding the school performance scores and
grades, using EVAAS, the State Board shall designate that a school has met, exceeded, or has
not met expected growth. The designation of student growth shall be clearly displayed in the
annual school report card provided under G.S. 115C-12(9)c1., 115C-218.65, 115C-238.66, and
116-239.8.
(b) Access to Annual Report Card Information on the Department's Website. – The State
Board of Education shall provide user-friendly access to the public on the annual report cards
issued for local school administrative units and individual schools provided under
G.S. 115C-12(9)c1., 115C-218.65, 115C-238.66, and 116-239.8 through the Department of
Public Instruction's website. The annual report card shall be designed and organized to display
the following information more prominently than any other information:
(1) A summary for each local school administrative unit and for each individual
school of the school performance grades, whether the school has met,
exceeded, or has not met expected growth, and any other information required
to be provided as part of the annual report card.
(2) The percentage of schools receiving a school performance grade of A, B, C,
D, or F by local school administrative unit and statewide.
(3) The percentage of schools that have met, exceeded, or have not met expected
growth by local school administrative unit and statewide.
(4) A website for each individual school that prominently displays the school's
performance grades, whether the school has met, exceeded, or has not met
expected growth, and the school's performance scores in a way that is easy for
the user to read.
Page 4 House Bill 773-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) The ability to easily compare annual report card information, including school
performance grades and whether schools have met, exceeded, or have not met
expected growth, for local school administrative units and for individual
schools for a time span of at least three years.
(c) Report of Subgroup Performance Scores and Grades. – The subgroup performance
scores and grades shall be reported separately on the annual school report card provided under
G.S. 115C-12(9)c1., 115C-218.65, 115C-238.66, and 116-239.8 in a way that provides the
following information:
(1) For the current year and the previous two years, the performance score for
each subgroup of students identified in G.S. 115C-83.17C(a) for the school.
(2) The statewide average performance score for each subgroup identified in
G.S. 115C-83.17C(a).
(3) The difference between the performance score for all students in the school
and the performance score for each subgroup.
(4) Based on the information reported in subdivision (3) of this subsection, the
State Board shall determine and identify schools that are closing achievement
gaps, experiencing a widening of gaps, or seeing no significant gap changes.
(d) Elementary and Middle School Reading and Math Achievement Scores. – For schools
serving students in kindergarten through eighth grade, the school performance scores in reading
and mathematics, respectively, shall be reported separately on the annual school report card
provided under G.S. 115C-12(9)c1., 115C-218.65, 115C-238.66, and 116-239.8.
(e) Career and College Readiness Scores. – For schools serving any students in ninth
through twelfth grade, the percentage of students who meet at least one of the criteria in
G.S. 115C-83.17A(d)(4) shall be reported on the annual school report card provided under
G.S. 115C-12(9)c1., 115C-218.65, 115C-238.66, and 116-239.8.
"§ 115C-83.17E. School performance scores and grades for the purpose of compliance with
federal law.
The State Board of Education shall use the school performance scores and grades as
calculated under G.S. 115C-83.17A and G.S. 115C-83.17B, respectively, to satisfy the federal
requirement under the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, as amended by the
Every Student Succeeds Act (ESSA), P.L. 114-95, to meaningfully differentiate the performance
of schools on an annual basis."
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 115C-12(9)c1. reads as rewritten:
"c1. To issue an annual "report card" for the State and for each local school
administrative unit, assessing each unit's efforts to improve student
performance based on the growth in performance of the students in
each school and taking into account progress over the previous years'
level of performance and the State's performance in comparison with
other states. This assessment shall take into account factors that have
been shown to affect student performance and that the State Board
considers relevant to assess the State's efforts to improve student
performance. The annual "report card" for each local school
administrative unit shall include the following:
1. The State Board shall award, in accordance with
G.S. 115C-83.15, an overall numerical school achievement,
growth, and award, in accordance with G.S. 115C-83.17A, a
performance score on a scale of zero to 100 and and, in
accordance with G.S. 115C-83.17B, a corresponding
performance letter grade of A, B, C, D, or F earned by each
school within the local school administrative unit. The school
performance score and grade shall reflect student performance
House Bill 773-Second Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
on annual subject-specific assessments, college and workplace
readiness measures, graduation rates, and student progress in
achieving English language proficiency. In addition, the State
Board shall award separate performance scores and grades for
the following:
I. School performance of certain subgroups of students as
provided in G.S. 115C-83.15.G.S. 115C-83.17C.
II. For schools serving students in any grade from
kindergarten to eighth grade, school performance in
reading and mathematics respectively.
2. For schools serving students in third grade, the number and
percentage of third grade students who (i) take and pass the
alternative assessment of reading comprehension; (ii) were
retained in third grade for not demonstrating reading
proficiency as indicated in G.S. 115C-83.7(a); and (iii) were
exempt from mandatory third grade retention by category of
exemption as listed in G.S. 115C-83.7(b).
3. For high schools, measures of Advanced Placement course
participation, Cambridge Advanced International Certificate of
Education (AICE) Program participation, and International
Baccalaureate Diploma Programme participation and
Advanced Placement, Cambridge AICE, and International
Baccalaureate examination participation and performance.
4. For schools serving any students in ninth through twelfth
grade, the percentage of students who achieved the minimum
score required for admission into a constituent institution of
The University of North Carolina on a nationally normed test
of college readiness.
5. For schools serving any students in ninth through twelfth
grade, the percentage of students enrolled in Career and
Technical Education courses who score at Silver, Gold, or
Platinum levels on a nationally normed test of workplace
readiness."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 115C-12(24) reads as rewritten:
"(24) Duty to Develop Standards for Alternative Learning Programs, Provide
Technical Assistance on Implementation of Programs, and Evaluate
Programs. – The State Board of Education shall adopt standards for assigning
students to alternative learning programs. These standards shall include (i) a
description of the programs and services that are recommended to be provided
in alternative learning programs and (ii) a process for ensuring that an
assignment is appropriate for the student and that the student's parents are
involved in the decision. The State Board also shall adopt policies that define
what constitutes an alternative school and an alternative learning program.
The State Board of Education shall also adopt standards to require that
local school administrative units shall use (i) the teachers allocated for
students assigned to alternative learning programs pursuant to the regular
teacher allotment and (ii) the teachers allocated for students assigned to
alternative learning programs only to serve the needs of these students.
The State Board of Education shall provide technical support to local
school administrative units to assist them in developing and implementing
plans and proposals for alternative learning programs.
Page 6 House Bill 773-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The State Board shall evaluate the effectiveness of alternative learning
programs and, in its discretion, of any other programs funded from the
Alternative Schools/At-Risk Student allotment. Local school administrative
units shall report to the State Board of Education on how funds in the
Alternative Schools/At-Risk Student allotment are spent and shall otherwise
cooperate with the State Board of Education in evaluating the alternative
learning programs. As part of its evaluation of the effectiveness of these
programs, the State Board shall, through the application of the accountability
system developed under G.S. 115C-83.15 Part 1B of Article 8 of this Chapter
and G.S. 115C-105.35, measure the educational performance and growth of
students placed in alternative schools and alternative programs. If appropriate,
the Board may modify this system to adapt to the specific characteristics of
these schools. Also as part of its evaluation, the State Board shall evaluate its
standards adopted under this subdivision and make any necessary changes to
those standards based on strategies that have been proven successful in
improving student achievement and shall report to the Joint Legislative
Education Oversight Committee by April 15, 2006 to determine if any
changes are necessary to improve the implementation of successful alternative
learning programs and alternative schools."
SECTION 3.(c) G.S. 115C-47(58) reads as rewritten:
"(58) To Inform the Public About the North Carolina School Report Cards Issued
by the State Board of Education. – Each local board of education shall ensure
that the report card issued for it by the State Board of Education receives wide
distribution to the local press or is otherwise provided to the public. Each local
board of education shall ensure that the overall school performance score and
grade earned by each school in the local school administrative unit for the
current and previous four school years is prominently displayed on the Web
site of the local school administrative unit. If any school in the local school
administrative unit earned an overall a school performance grade of D or F,
the local board of education shall provide notice of the grade in writing to the
parent or guardian of all students enrolled in that school."
SECTION 3.(d) G.S. 115C-105.34(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) Curriculum. – Materials or programs related to courses offered by an
economically disadvantaged public school.
(2) Economically disadvantaged public school. – A school in a local school
administrative unit or a charter school with a student population that is
composed of at least eighty percent (80%) of students identified by the
Department of Public Instruction as economically disadvantaged students.
(3) Eligible employee. – Any full-time or part-time employee of a qualifying
economically disadvantaged public school.
(4) Qualifying economically disadvantaged public school. – An economically
disadvantaged public school that exceeded expected growth in the prior school
year, as determined by the State Board of Education pursuant to
G.S. 115C-83.15(c).Part 1B of Article 8 of this Chapter."
SECTION 3.(e) G.S. 115C-105.37(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Identification of Low-Performing Schools. – The State Board of Education shall
identify low-performing schools on an annual basis. Low-performing schools are those that earn
an overall a school performance grade of D or F and a school growth score of "met expected
growth" or "not met expected growth" as defined by G.S. 115C-83.15.Part 1B of Article 8 of this
Chapter."
House Bill 773-Second Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.(f) G.S. 115C-105.39(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Within 30 days of the initial identification of a school as low-performing by the State
Board under G.S. 115C-105.37(a), the superintendent shall take one of the following actions
concerning the school's principal: (i) recommend to the local board that the principal be retained
in the same position, (ii) recommend to the local board that the principal be retained in the same
position and a plan of remediation should be developed, (iii) recommend to the local board that
the principal be transferred, or (iv) proceed under G.S. 115C-325.4 to dismiss or demote the
principal. The superintendent may only recommend a principal be retained in the same position
without a plan for remediation if the principal has been at the school for less than two years or,
in the case of a principal having been at the school for two years or more, if the school has both
met student growth and has improved student achievement school performance scores under
G.S. 115C-83.15 G.S. 115C-83.17A for the prior school year. The principal shall not be
transferred to another principal position unless (i) it is in a school classification in which the
principal previously demonstrated at least 2 years of success, (ii) there is a plan to evaluate and
provide remediation to the principal for at least one year following the transfer to assure the
principal does not impede student performance at the school to which the principal is being
transferred; and (iii) the parents of the students at the school to which the principal is being
transferred are notified. The principal shall not be transferred to another low-performing school
in the local school administrative unit. If the superintendent intends to recommend demotion or
dismissal, the superintendent shall notify the local board. Within 15 days of (i) receiving
notification that the superintendent intends to proceed under G.S. 115C-325.4 or (ii) its decision
concerning the superintendent's recommendation, but no later than September 30, the local board
shall submit to the State Board a written notice of the action taken and the basis for that action.
If the State Board does not assign an assistance team to that school or if the State Board assigns
an assistance team to that school and the superintendent proceeds under G.S. 115C-325.4 to
dismiss or demote the principal, then the State Board shall take no further action. If the State
Board assigns an assistance team to the school and the superintendent is not proceeding under
G.S. 115C-325.4 to dismiss or demote the principal, then the State Board shall vote to accept,
reject, or modify the local board's recommendations. The State Board shall notify the local board
of its action within five days. If the State Board rejects or modifies the local board's
recommendations and does not recommend dismissal of the principal, the State Board's
notification shall include recommended action concerning the principal's assignment or terms of
employment. Upon receipt of the State Board's notification, the local board shall implement the
State Board's recommended action concerning the principal's assignment or terms of employment
unless the local board asks the State Board to reconsider that recommendation. The State Board
shall provide an opportunity for the local board to be heard before the State Board acts on the
local board's request for a reconsideration. The State Board shall vote to affirm or modify its
original recommended action and shall notify the local board of its action within five days. Upon
receipt of the State Board's notification, the local board shall implement the State Board's final
recommended action concerning the principal's assignment or terms of employment. If the State
Board rejects or modifies the local board's action and recommends dismissal of the principal, the
State Board shall proceed under G.S. 115C-325.12."
SECTION 3.(g) G.S. 115C-105.39A reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-105.39A. Identification of low-performing local school administrative units.
(a) Identification of Low-Performing Local School Administrative Units. – The State
Board of Education shall identify low-performing local school administrative units on an annual
basis. A low-performing local school administrative unit is a unit in which the majority of the
schools in that unit that earned an overall a school performance grade and school growth score
as provided in G.S. 115C-83.15 Part 1B of Article 8 of this Chapter have been identified as
low-performing schools, as provided in G.S. 115C-105.37.
…
Page 8 House Bill 773-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Parental Notice of Low-Performing Local School Administrative Unit Status. – Each
local school administrative unit that the State Board identifies as low-performing shall provide
written notification to the parents and guardians of all students attending any school in the local
school administrative unit within 30 days of the identification that includes the following
information:
(1) A statement that the State Board of Education has found that a majority of the
schools in the local school administrative unit have earned an overall a school
performance grade of D or F and a school growth score of "met expected
growth" or "not met expected growth" and have been identified as
low-performing schools as defined by G.S. 115C-105.37. The statement shall
also include an explanation of the school performance grades and school
growth scores.
…
(6) For notifications sent to parents and guardians of students attending a school
that is identified as low-performing under G.S. 115C-105.37, a statement that
the State Board of Education has found that the school has earned an overall
a school performance grade of D or F and a school growth score of "met
expected growth" or "not met expected growth" and has been identified as a
low-performing school as defined by G.S. 115C-105.37. This notification also
shall include the overall school performance grade and school growth score
the school earned and an explanation of the school performance grades and
school growth scores."
SECTION 3.(h) G.S. 115C-150.11(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) State Board of Education Supervision. – The State Board of Education shall have
general supervision over the schools for the deaf and blind in accordance with G.S. 115C-12 and
shall establish approximately equivalent service areas for each school for the deaf that cover the
entire State. In establishing the service area for each school for the deaf, the State Board shall
consider both the geographic proximity to the school for the deaf and the population of the service
area. The State Board shall evaluate the effectiveness of the schools for the deaf and blind and
shall, through the application of the accountability system developed under G.S. 115C-83.15 Part
1B of Article 8 of this Chapter and G.S. 115C-105.35, measure the educational performance and
growth of students placed in each school. If appropriate, the Board may modify this system to
adapt to the specific characteristics of these schools. The boards of trustees for the schools for
the deaf and blind shall be subject to rules adopted by the State Board of Education in accordance
with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes."
SECTION 3.(i) G.S. 115C-218.65 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-218.65. North Carolina School Report Cards.
A charter school shall ensure that the report card issued for it by the State Board of Education
receives wide distribution to the local press or is otherwise provided to the public. A charter
school shall ensure that the overall school performance score and grade earned by the charter
school for the current and previous four school years is prominently displayed on the school Web
site. If a charter school earned an overall a school performance grade of D or F, the charter school
shall provide notice of the grade in writing to the parent or guardian of all students enrolled in
that school."
SECTION 3.(j) G.S. 115C-218.94(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Identification of Low-Performing Charter Schools. – The State Board of Education
shall identify low-performing charter schools on an annual basis. Low-performing charter
schools are those that earn an overall a school performance grade of D or F and a school growth
score of "met expected growth" or "not met expected growth" as defined by G.S. 115C-83.15.Part
1B of Article 8 of this Chapter."
SECTION 3.(k) G.S. 115C-285.1 reads as rewritten:
House Bill 773-Second Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 115C-285.1. Principal recruitment supplement.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions shall apply in this section:
(1) Eligible employer. – The governing board of a local school administrative unit
with an eligible school.
(2) Eligible school. – A low-performing school, as defined in G.S. 115C-105.37,
that received an overall a school performance score that placed it in the bottom
five percent (5%) of all schools in the State in the prior school year.
(3) Qualifying principal. – A principal who is paid on the Exceeded Growth
column of the Principal Salary Schedule.
(4) Qualifying school. – An eligible school selected by the Department to
participate in the Program.
…
(d) Time Line. – To the extent funds are made available for the Program, the following
time line shall apply:
(1) No later than December 1, 2019, and October 1 of each year thereafter, the
Department shall notify an eligible employer with one or more eligible schools
that the eligible employer may be selected to participate in the Program.
(2) No later than January 15, 2020, and November 1 of each year thereafter, each
eligible employer that seeks to participate in the Program shall notify the
Department of its intent.
(3) No later than January 31, 2020, and November 15 of each year thereafter, the
Department shall notify any eligible employer with a qualifying school that
the school qualifies for the Program, up to a statewide total of 40 schools. In
making its selections, the Department shall prioritize eligible schools with the
lowest overall school performance scores.
(4) No later than May 1, 2020, and annually thereafter, each eligible employer
with a qualifying school shall do all of the following:
a. Execute all applicable contracts with qualifying principals.
b. Notify the Department of the (i) identity of principals and schools in
the unit that will participate in the Program, (ii) length of the contract
period between the eligible employer and each qualifying principal,
and (iii) length of time the qualifying principal will receive the salary
supplement.
(5) No later than August 1, 2020, and annually thereafter, all qualifying principals
identified pursuant to sub-subdivision (4)b. of this subsection shall begin
employment as a principal at the applicable qualifying school.
…."
SECTION 3.(l) G.S. 115C-289.2(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Principal and School Performance. – The State of the School Administration
Profession Report prepared by the State Board of Education pursuant to this section shall analyze
the relationship between the data included in subsection (b) of this section and student growth,
student achievement, and school growth and school performance, as calculated by
G.S. 115C-83.15(c), Part 1B of Article 8 of this Chapter, including the extent to which principal
attrition and mobility led to changes in school performance."
SECTION 3.(m) G.S. 115C-310.9(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) ATR Unit Review. – The State Board of Education shall review each ATR unit once
every five years to ensure the unit is complying with the approved ATR plan. As part of the
review, the State Board of Education shall consider at least the following information:
(1) The total number of teachers in advanced teaching roles in the unit, the number
of teachers in each advanced teaching role identified in the unit's ATR plan,
and the number of students receiving instruction from those teachers.
Page 10 House Bill 773-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) For each ATR school in the ATR unit, the total number of teachers in
advanced teaching roles in the school, the number of teachers in each
advanced teaching role identified in the unit's ATR plan in the school, the
number of students receiving instruction from those teachers, and the number
of teachers led by each ATR team lead.
(3) Growth scores for students calculated pursuant to G.S. 115C-83.15.Part 1B of
Article 8 of this Chapter.
(4) Achievement scores for students Performance scores for schools calculated
pursuant to G.S. 115C-83.15.G.S. 115C-83.17A.
(5) Retention of effective teachers.
(6) Results of the Teacher Working Conditions Survey.
(7) Ratings of teachers through the North Carolina Teacher Evaluation System.
(8) Evidence that higher performing teachers have been selected to serve in an
advanced teaching role.
(9) A description of the activities undertaken by ATR team leads to (i) support
the professional development of teachers on their team and (ii) enhance
instruction by better aligning teachers' strengths with student needs.
(10) The amount and funding source for any salary supplement received by
teachers in advanced teaching roles in the unit.
(11) A description of the amount of release time given to each ATR team lead, how
the release time is spent, and how the school facilitates providing that release
time."
SECTION 3.(n) G.S. 116-239.8(b)(14) reads as rewritten:
"(14) North Carolina school report cards. – A laboratory school shall ensure that the
report card issued for it by the State Board of Education receives wide
distribution to the local press or is otherwise provided to the public. A
laboratory school shall ensure that the overall school performance score and
grade earned by the laboratory school for the current and previous four school
years is prominently displayed on the school Web site. If a laboratory school
earned an overall a school performance grade of D or F, the laboratory school
shall provide notice of the grade in writing to the parent or guardian of all
students enrolled in that school."
SECTION 3.(o) G.S. 116-239.13(3) reads as rewritten:
"(3) Public school student achievement data, including school performance grades
and student achievement scores and student growth, student growth scores, at
each laboratory school."
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to school
performance scores and grades calculated based on data from the 2025-2026 school year.
House Bill 773-Second Edition Page 11